New York, session 2025-2026, S10504.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision b of section 26-405.1 of the administrative 2 code of the city of New York, as added by section 5 of part K of chapter 3 36 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 4 b. The division shall establish an annual inspection and audit process 5 which shall review twenty-five percent of applications for a temporary 6 major capital improvement increase that have been submitted and 7 approved. Such process shall include individual inspections and document 8 review to ensure that owners complied with all obligations and responsi- 9 bilities under the law for temporary major capital improvement 10 increases. Inspections shall include in-person confirmation that such 11 improvements have been completed in such way as described in the appli- 12 cation. The division shall conspicuously make available on its website 13 the results of every annual audit conducted pursuant to this subdivision 14 and shall publish new audit results on its website annually. 15 § 2. Subdivision b of section 26-511.1 of the administrative code of 16 the city of New York, as added by section 4 of part K of chapter 36 of 17 the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 18 b. The division shall establish an annual inspection and audit process 19 which shall review twenty-five percent of applications for a temporary 20 major capital improvement increase that have been submitted and 21 approved. Such process shall include individual inspections and document 22 review to ensure that owners complied with all obligations and responsi- 23 bilities under the law for temporary major capital improvement EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02496-01-5 S. 10504 2 1 increases. Inspections shall include in-person confirmation that such 2 improvements have been completed in such way as described in the appli- 3 cation. The division shall conspicuously make available on its website 4 the results of every annual audit conducted pursuant to this subdivision 5 and shall publish new audit results on its website annually. 6 § 3. Subdivision (b) of section 10-b of section 4 of chapter 576 of 7 the laws of 1974, constituting the emergency tenant protection act of 8 nineteen seventy-four, as added by section 6 of part K of chapter 36 of 9 the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 10 (b) The division shall establish an annual inspection and audit proc- 11 ess which shall review twenty-five percent of applications for a tempo- 12 rary major capital improvement increase that have been submitted and 13 approved. Such process shall include individual inspections and document 14 review to ensure that owners complied with all obligations and responsi- 15 bilities under the law for temporary major capital improvement 16 increases. Inspections shall include in-person confirmation that such 17 improvements have been completed in such way as described in the appli- 18 cation. The division shall conspicuously make available on its website 19 the results of every annual audit conducted pursuant to this subdivision 20 and shall publish new audit results on its website annually. 21 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 8-a of chapter 274 of the laws of 1946, 22 constituting the emergency housing rent control law, as added by section 23 7 of part K of chapter 36 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 2. The division shall establish an annual inspection and audit process 26 which shall review twenty-five percent of applications for a temporary 27 major capital improvement increase that have been submitted and 28 approved. Such process shall include individual inspections and document 29 review to ensure that owners complied with all obligations and responsi- 30 bilities under the law for temporary major capital improvement 31 increases. Inspections shall include in-person confirmation that such 32 improvements have been completed in such way as described in the appli- 33 cation. The division shall conspicuously make available on its website 34 the results of every annual audit conducted pursuant to this subdivision 35 and shall publish new audit results on its website annually. 36 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that the amend- 37 ments to section 26-405.1 of the city rent and rehabilitation law made 38 by section one of this act shall remain in full force and effect only as 39 long as the public emergency requiring the regulation and control of 40 residential rents and evictions continues, as provided in subdivision 3 41 of section 1 of the local emergency housing rent control act; and 42 provided that the amendments to section 26-511.1 of chapter 4 of title 43 26 of the administrative code of the city of New York made by section 44 two of this act shall expire on the same date as such law expires and 45 shall not affect the expiration of such law as provided under section 46 26-520 of such law.